Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 431 General Provisions Concerning Crimes and Punishments
431.076.
Expungement of criminal records for those acquitted of crimes, for whom charges have been dismissed but not in exchange for a guilty plea to another charge, or against whom charges have not resulted in an indictment or an information filed by the Commonwealth's attorney — Effects of an order of expungement — Expungement by court or upon petition of person charged — Exception for records in the custody of the Department for Community Based Services.

On or after July 15, 2020, if a court enters an order of acquittal of criminal charges against a person, or enters an order dismissing with prejudice all criminal charges in a case against a person and not in exchange for a guilty plea to another charge, the court shall order the record expunged upon the expiration of thirty (30) days, unless the person objects to the expungement. As used in this paragraph, “criminal charges” shall not include a traffic infraction not otherwise classified as a misdemeanor. The order expunging the records shall not require any action by the person.

A person who has been charged with a criminal offense and who has been acquitted of the charges, or against whom charges have been dismissed and not in exchange for a guilty plea to another charge, and whose records have not been expunged pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, may petition the court in which the disposition of the charges was made to expunge all charges.

A person against whom felony charges originally filed in the District Court have not resulted in an indictment by the grand jury or in an information filed by the Commonwealth’s attorney may petition the District Court in which the charges were filed to dismiss and expunge all charges for which an indictment or information has not issued.

An expungement petition brought under subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section shall be filed no sooner than:

Sixty (60) days following the order of acquittal or dismissal with prejudice by the court;

Six (6) months following the date of the District Court decision to hold the matter to the grand jury; or

For charges dismissed without prejudice:

For felony charges, three (3) years following the date of the order of dismissal without prejudice; or

For misdemeanor charges, one (1) year following the date of the order of dismissal without prejudice.

If the court finds that the petition under subsection (1)(b) of this section is properly brought, the court shall grant the petition and order the expunging of the records.

If the expungement petition is brought under subsection (1)(c) of this section, the petition shall be served upon the offices of the county and Commonwealth’s attorneys that prosecuted the case.

Following the filing of the petition, the court shall notify the county and Commonwealth’s attorneys of an opportunity for a response to the petition. The response shall be filed within ninety (90) days after the filing of the petition.

If a response is not filed, ninety (90) days after the filing of the petition the court shall dismiss the charges without prejudice and order the expunging of the records.

If a response is filed, ninety (90) days after the date the response is filed, if an indictment has not issued, the court shall dismiss without prejudice the charges for which an indictment has not issued and order the expunging of the records.

An order of expungement pursuant to this section shall expunge all criminal records in the custody of the court and any criminal records in the custody of any other agency or official, including law enforcement records, but no order of expungement pursuant to this section shall expunge records in the custody of the Department for Community Based Services. The court shall order the expunging on a form provided by the Administrative Office of the Courts. Every agency, with records relating to the arrest, charge, or other matters arising out of the arrest or charge, that is ordered to expunge records, shall certify to the court within sixty (60) days of the entry of the expungement order, that the required expunging action has been completed. All orders enforcing the expungement procedure shall also be expunged.

If an expungement is ordered under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, an appellate court which issued an opinion in the case shall order the appellate case file to be sealed and also direct that the version of the appellate opinion published on the court’s Web site be modified to avoid use of the defendant’s name in the case title and body of the opinion.

If an expungement is ordered under subsection (1)(c) of this section, an appellate court which issued an opinion in the case may, upon motion of the petitioner in the case, order the appellate case file to be sealed and also direct that the version of the appellate opinion published on the court’s Web site be modified to avoid use of the petitioner’s name in the case title and body of the opinion.

After the expungement, the proceedings in the matter shall be deemed never to have occurred. The court and other agencies shall delete or remove the records from their computer systems so that any official state-performed background check will indicate that the records do not exist. The court and other agencies shall reply to any inquiry that no record exists on the matter. The person whose record is expunged shall not have to disclose the fact of the record or any matter relating thereto on an application for employment, credit, or other type of application.

Inspection of the records included in the order may thereafter be permitted by the court only upon petition by the person who is the subject of the records and only to those persons named in the petition.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section, this section shall be retroactive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 374, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 426, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 648, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 69, § 16, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 94, § 2, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 188, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

431.078.
Expungement of misdemeanor, violation, and traffic infraction records of convictions and dismissed or amended charges.

Any person who has been convicted of:

A misdemeanor, a violation, or a traffic infraction not otherwise classified as a misdemeanor or violation, or a series of misdemeanors, violations, or traffic infractions arising from a single incident; or

A series of misdemeanors, violations, or traffic infractions not arising from a single incident;

may petition the court in which he was convicted for expungement of his misdemeanor or violation record within that judicial district, including a record of any charges for misdemeanors, violations, or traffic infractions that were dismissed or amended in the criminal action. The person shall be informed of the right at the time of adjudication.

Except as provided in KRS 218A.275(8) and 218A.276(8), the petition shall be filed no sooner than five (5) years after the completion of the person’s sentence or five (5) years after the successful completion of the person’s probation, whichever occurs later.

Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall set a date for a hearing, no sooner than thirty (30) days after the filing of the petition, and shall notify the county attorney; the victim of the crime, if there was an identified victim; and any other person whom the person filing the petition has reason to believe may have relevant information related to the expungement of the record. Inability to locate the victim shall not delay the proceedings in the case or preclude the holding of a hearing or the issuance of an order of expungement.

For a petition brought under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the court shall order expunged all records in the custody of the court and any records in the custody of any other agency or official, including law enforcement records, if at the hearing the court finds that:

The offense was not a sex offense or an offense committed against a child;

The person had not in the five (5) years prior to the filing of the petition for expungement been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor;

No proceeding concerning a felony or misdemeanor is pending or being instituted against the person; and

The offense is not one subject to enhancement for a second or subsequent offense or the time for such an enhancement has expired.

For a petition brought under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order expunged all records in the custody of the court and any records in the custody of any other agency or official, including law enforcement records, if at the hearing the court finds that:

The offense was not a sex offense or an offense committed against a child;

The person had not in the five (5) years prior to the filing of the petition for expungement been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor;

No proceeding concerning a felony or misdemeanor is pending or being instituted against the person; and

The offense is not one subject to enhancement for a second or subsequent offense or the time for such an enhancement has expired.

Upon the entry of an order to expunge the records, the proceedings in the case shall be deemed never to have occurred; the court and other agencies shall cause records to be deleted or removed from their computer systems so that the matter shall not appear on official state-performed background checks; the persons and the court may properly reply that no record exists with respect to the persons upon any inquiry in the matter; and the person whose record is expunged shall not have to disclose the fact of the record or any matter relating thereto on an application for employment, credit, or other type of application.

The filing fee for a petition under this section shall be one hundred dollars ($100). The first fifty dollars ($50) of each fee collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into a trust and agency account for deputy clerks and shall not be refundable.

Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency or official named therein.

Inspection of the records included in the order may thereafter be permitted by the court only upon petition by the person who is the subject of the records and only to those persons named in the petition.

This section shall be deemed to be retroactive, and any person who has been convicted of a misdemeanor prior to July 14, 1992, may petition the court in which he was convicted, or if he was convicted prior to the inception of the District Court to the District Court in the county where he now resides, for expungement of the record of one (1) misdemeanor offense or violation or a series of misdemeanor offenses or violations arising from a single incident, provided that the offense was not one specified in subsection (4) and that the offense was not the precursor offense of a felony offense for which he was subsequently convicted. This section shall apply only to offenses against the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

As used in this section, “violation” has the same meaning as in KRS

500.080

.

Any person denied an expungement prior to June 25, 2013, due to the presence of a traffic infraction on his or her record may file a new petition for expungement of the previously petitioned offenses, which the court shall hear and decide under the terms of this section. No court costs or other fees, from the court or any other agency, shall be required of a person filing a new petition under this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 325, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 374, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2008, ch. 158, § 7, effective July 1, 2008; 2011, ch. 2, § 97, effective June 8, 2011; 2013, ch. 69, § 17, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 94, § 3, effective July 15, 2016.

431.079.
Petition or application seeking expungement to include certification of eligibility for expungement from Department of Kentucky State Police and Administrative Office of the Courts — Administrative regulations — Construction.

Every petition or application filed seeking expungement of a conviction shall include a certification of eligibility for expungement. The Department of Kentucky State Police and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall certify that the agencies have conducted a criminal background check on the petitioner and whether or not the petitioner is eligible to have the requested record expunged. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section, in consultation with the Administrative Office of the Courts.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the expungement of a case ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

For the purposes of this section, KRS

431.073

,

431.076

, and

431.078

, “expungement” means the removal or deletion of records by the court and other agencies which prevents the matter from appearing on official state-performed background checks.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 69, § 15, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 94, § 4, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 188, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2013). Although
2013 Ky. Acts ch. 69, sec. 15, subsec. (2) defines expungement for the purposes of “this section and Sections 2 and 3 of this Act” (KRS

346.040

and

346.135

), the references have been codified as “this section and
KRS

431.076

and

431.078

” (2013 Ky. Acts ch. 69, secs. 16 and
17) under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1)(h), in order to correct a manifest typographical or clerical error that occurred when the provisions of House Bill 57/HCS were drafted as an amendment to Senate Bill 78, but the internal references were not changed to conform.

431.0795.
Expungement fund.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a fund designated the “expungement fund.”

The fund shall be administered by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

Beginning on June 27, 2019, the revenues and interest from the expungement fee imposed by KRS

431.073

shall be deposited in the fund.

On January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of each year, the balance of the fund shall be distributed as follows:

Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed to the Department for Libraries and Archives;

Forty percent (40%) shall be distributed to the Department of Kentucky State Police;

Forty percent (40%) shall be equally distributed among the offices of Commonwealth’s attorneys; and

Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed to the Administrative Office of the Courts to be deposited into the trust and agency account for deputy circuit clerks along with the fee established in KRS 431.073(10).

All interest earned on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and shall not lapse.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.

Moneys deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section and shall not be appropriated or transferred by the General Assembly for any other purposes.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 188, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

431.080.
Conviction of felony does not bar civil remedy.

The conviction of a felony shall not stay or merge any civil remedy of the person aggrieved against the felon.

History.

1127.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Injury of person by violation of statute, recovery of damages where fine or forfeiture imposed, KRS

446.070

.

431.082.
Civil action by victim against defendant — Damages — Construction.

In the event of the conviction of a defendant for the violation of any offense proscribed by KRS Chapter 510 or 531 or any human trafficking offense proscribed by KRS Chapter 529, the person who was the victim of the offense may bring an action in damages against the defendant in the criminal case.

If the plaintiff prevails, he or she shall be entitled to attorney’s fees and all other costs incurred in the bringing of the action, including but not limited to the services of expert witnesses, testing and counseling, medical and psychological treatment, and other expenses reasonably incurred as a result of the criminal act.

Any award of nominal damages shall support an award of attorneys fees and costs to the prevailing party.

Punitive damages as well as compensatory damages shall be awardable in cases brought under this section.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed as repealing any provision of KRS

431.080

or any other applicable statute or of any statutory or common law right of action but shall be construed as ancillary and supplemental thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 165, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 25, § 22, effective June 25, 2013.

431.090.
Limitation of prosecutions and of actions to recover penalties. [Repealed.]

431.095.
Process, execution on Sunday.

Process on a charge of treason or felony, for a riot or breach of the peace, or upon an escape out of custody, may be executed on Sunday.

History.

4567.

431.100.
Withholding of money payable by Commonwealth to defendant in satisfaction of money judgment in criminal proceeding — Fines and forfeitures go to Commonwealth — Disposition of fines from offenses relating to alcohol and to criminal littering — Monetary penalties payable to person other than circuit clerk — Notice to defendant required.

When a money judgment is entered against a defendant in a criminal proceeding and each sum, or any part thereof, remains unpaid, there shall be withheld from any disbursement, payment, benefit, compensation, salary, or other transfer of money from the Commonwealth of Kentucky to such defendant an amount equal to the unpaid amount of the judgment. Under no circumstances shall the general fund be used to reimburse court costs or pay for judgment.

Except as provided in this section, all fines and forfeitures imposed by law or ordinance shall inure to and vest in the Commonwealth.

Fines and forfeitures imposed by law for violation of KRS

222.202

or ordinances relating to similar subject matter shall inure to and vest in the Commonwealth and shall be placed in a special fund in the State Treasury, which shall not lapse, and which, effective July 1, 1987, shall be used solely by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for the provision of treatment and counseling programs for alcoholics.

Sixty percent (60%) of fines for violation of KRS

512.070

,

433.753

, and

433.757

shall, when collected, be transferred by the circuit clerk to the county treasurer for inclusion in the general fund of the county in which the offense occurs for the cleanup and abatement of litter and open dumps and forty percent (40%) shall be transferred to the agency that issued the citation. One hundred percent (100%) of any fines imposed for the violation of KRS

224.40-100

(5) and

224.99-010

(10) shall, when collected, be transferred to the treasurer of the county in which the violation occurred.

The court shall not order a fine, forfeiture, service fee, cost, or any other money due the Commonwealth or any other public officer paid to any person or organization other than one specifically required by the Kentucky Revised Statutes, nor shall a court suspend payment of a fine, forfeiture, service fee, cost, or any other money due the Commonwealth if the defendant makes a payment to another person or organization, unless so authorized by the court and the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

When, as authorized in the Kentucky Revised Statutes, a court does order a fine, forfeiture, service fee, cost, or any other monetary penalty to be paid to a person other than the circuit clerk, notice of this order will be served on the defendant and a copy of the order will be delivered to the person. Such an order constitutes a judgment of the court and carries with it all lawful means of enforcement and collection.

History.

1139: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 42; 1964, ch. 125, § 34; 1966, ch. 255, § 283; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 438, effective January 2, 1978; 1986, ch. 336, § 8, effective July 1, 1986; 1992, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 463, § 64, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 358, § 6, effective July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 426, § 600, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 183, § 25, effective August 1, 2002; 2002, ch. 342, § 12, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 649, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 137, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

431.102.
Service fee on certain misdemeanor convictions. [Repealed.]

431.105.
State to receive fines and forfeitures for certain height, width, length, and weight violations.

Notwithstanding any other statutory provisions to the contrary, all fines and forfeitures recovered in any court as a result of a conviction for the violation of any of the provisions of KRS

189.221

, 189.222(1), or

189.270

, which violation occurred on a state-maintained highway and arrest was made by any peace officer other than a member of the Department of Kentucky State Police, Department of Highways, or Department of Vehicle Regulation, shall inure to the benefit of the state, shall be paid to the State Treasurer for the use and benefit of the Department of Highways, and no part shall be returned to the local governmental units from which they were sent. These fines and forfeitures shall be paid into the State Treasury by the court collecting same and within thirty (30) days after imposition and collection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 148, § 1; 1962, ch. 121, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, §§ 20(1), 20(2); 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(1); 2007, ch. 85, § 310, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 75, § 21, effective June 25, 2009.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a state police officer makes an arrest for a traffic violation and brings the offender before the city police court, the fines and costs assessed by the police court of a city of the third class go to the city treasury and not to the state.

OAG 62-499

.

If an arrest for a violation of KRS

189.221

,

189.222

or

189.270

is made by a state trooper, state highway agent or department of motor transportation (now Department of Vehicle Regulation) agent, the fines and taxes are treated as any other fines and are sent to the circuit court clerk who reports and forwards them to the state treasury.

OAG 62-815

.

If an arrest is made by a local peace officer for a violation under KRS

189.221

,

189.222

or

189.270

, the fines recovered, as well as the taxes levied, must all be sent by the collecting court directly within 30 days after they are imposed and collected.

OAG 62-815

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Property subject to forfeiture under Penal Code, disposition, KRS

500.090

.

431.110.
Fines and forfeitures from county and quarterly courts returned to county. [Repealed.]

431.120.
Person first suing entitled to certain fines and forfeitures.

The person who first, in good faith, brings an action for and recovers judgment shall be entitled to the penalty incurred by the defendant in all cases where a part or all of the fine or forfeiture is given by law to the person suing. No action or judgment to screen the offender from a penalty, or to prevent an action for the penalty in good faith by another person, shall be available against a prosecution carried on in good faith and without collusion with the defendant.

History.

1359.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Claimants of property forfeited under Penal Code, requirements, KRS

500.090

.

431.130.
Confinement in penitentiary, county jail or workhouse — Nature.

Prisoners sentenced to punishment by confinement in the penitentiary shall be kept at hard labor. If the punishment is imprisonment in the jail of the county, the imprisonment shall be close confinement in the jail of the county where the trial was held, unless otherwise provided. In any jurisdiction where there is a county workhouse the court may in its discretion confine the prisoner to the county workhouse instead of the county jail.

History.

1136: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 17, § 1; 1952, ch. 43, § 2; 1962, ch. 234, § 43; 1974, ch. 406, § 315.

431.140.
Option of working prisoner at community service related project or at hard labor. [Repealed.]

431.150.
Defendant credited for time imprisoned during inability to secure bail. [Repealed.]

431.155.
Jail time prior to sentence to state institution to be credited against sentence — How applied. [Repealed.]

431.160.
Accessory before the fact — How punishable. [Repealed.]

431.170.
Accessory after the fact — How punishable. [Repealed.]

431.180.
Confession of judgment. [Repealed.]

431.190.
Conviction of felony — Punishment on second and third offenses. [Repealed.]

431.200.
Reparation for property stolen or damaged, from person convicted.

Any person convicted of a misdemeanor or felony for taking, injuring or destroying property shall restore the property or make reparation in damages if not ordered as a condition of probation. The court in which the conviction is had, if applied to by verified petition made within ninety (90) days of the date the sentence was pronounced, may order restitution or give judgment against the defendant for reparation in damages, and enforce collection by execution or other process. In a petition for restitution or reparation, the court shall cause the defendant, if in custody, to be brought into court, and demand of him if he has any defense to make to the petition. If he consents to the restitution or to reparation in damages in an agreed sum, the court shall give judgment accordingly. Otherwise a jury shall be impaneled to try the facts and ascertain the amount and the value of the property, or assess the damage, as the case may be. A failure to pursue this remedy shall not deprive the person aggrieved of his civil action for the injury sustained.

History.

1132, 1135: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 439, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 162, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

431.210.
Return of property stolen if accused does not appear.

If any person indicted for stealing property, or for having stolen property in his possession, breaks jail, forfeits his recognizance, or otherwise fails to appear for trial at the proper time, the person claiming the property may make a motion in the court in which the indictment is pending for the return of the property to him. The claim shall be supported by the affidavit of the person claiming the property. The motion shall be continued for thirty (30) days before final action is taken. A notice of the motion, served upon the attorney for the Commonwealth, shall be taken as a notice served upon the person named in the indictment, and shall give the court jurisdiction of the matter. The attorney for the Commonwealth shall defend the motion. A jury shall try the facts, and if it finds in its verdict that the claimant is entitled to the possession of the property, the court shall enter judgment accordingly. The court may enforce the judgment by rule, attachment and imprisonment as in cases of contempt. The costs of the proceedings shall be paid by the claimant, for which he may have judgment and execution against the person stealing the property.

History.

1133, 1134: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 440, effective January 2, 1978.

431.213.
Definitions for KRS 431.213, 431.2135, and 431.240.

As used in KRS

431.2135

and

431.240

:

“Condemned person” means a person for whom a specific day of execution is fixed by a mandate from the Kentucky Supreme Court or a warrant signed by the Governor.

“Insane” means the condemned person does not have the ability to understand:

That the person is about to be executed; and

Why the person is to be executed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 156, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Article: The Undiscovered Country: Execution Competency & Comprehending Death, 98 Ky. L.J. 263 (2009/2010).

431.2135.
Procedure for challenging condemned person’s sanity.

This section shall provide the exclusive procedure for challenging a condemned person’s sanity, unless the Supreme Court of Kentucky expressly adopts a rule of court providing otherwise.

A condemned person or the person’s attorney may file a motion for stay of execution on the grounds that the condemned person is insane. The motion shall be filed in the Circuit Court of the county where the condemned person is incarcerated, or the county in which the condemned person was convicted, and shall be supported by at least two (2) affidavits. The Attorney General shall file a response within the time ordered by the court.

Upon receiving a motion under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall order the condemned person to be evaluated by at least two (2) licensed mental health professionals and shall order the mental health professionals to submit their written evaluation to the court within ten (10) days of the evaluation. The court shall then schedule and conduct a hearing as soon as possible to determine whether the condemned person is insane.

The court shall base its determination of insanity on a preponderance of the evidence. The court’s determination may be appealed to the Supreme Court by the condemned person or the Attorney General.

If the condemned person is determined to be insane, he or she shall be committed to the Kentucky Correctional Psychiatric Center. The treating psychiatrist shall then report, once each month or more frequently if the court orders, to the court and the condemned person’s counsel on the progress the condemned person has made and whether there is a substantial probability that the person will become sane. If at any time a psychiatrist treating or evaluating the person determines the person to be sane, the psychiatrist shall immediately report that fact to the court.

Upon receiving a report that a condemned person has become sane, the court shall schedule an evaluation and conduct a hearing in accordance with subsections (2) and (3) of this section to determine sanity. The court’s determination may be appealed to the Supreme Court by the condemned person or the Attorney General.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 158, effective July 15, 1998.

431.215.
Conveyance of prisoner to institution of confinement.

If the judgment imposes a sentence of death or confinement in the penitentiary, county jail or other institution, two (2) certified copies thereof shall be furnished forthwith to the sheriff who shall execute the same by delivering the defendant and a certified copy of the judgment to the person in charge of the penitentiary, jail or institution of confinement and making a written return thereof in the office of the circuit clerk within ten (10) days after the execution.

When the judgment imposes a sentence of death or confinement in the penitentiary, the county in which the prisoner is incarcerated shall receive from the State Treasury a fee per day beginning on the day on which judgment was rendered and ending the day that the defendant is delivered to the penitentiary. The fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for use for the incarceration of prisoners as provided in KRS

441.025

.

History.

1137-2: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 44; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 441, effective January 2, 1978; 1984, ch. 415, § 11, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 382, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2014, ch. 94, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

431.216.
Commitment of person convicted of felony. [Repealed.]

431.218.
Date of execution of condemned — Copy of mandate to proper officer.

When a judgment sentencing the defendant to death has been affirmed, the mandate shall fix the day of the execution as the fifth Friday following the date of the mandate of the court. The clerk of the Supreme Court shall transmit either by special messenger or by certified mail, return receipt requested, a certified copy of the mandate to the proper officer which shall be the authority of such officer to carry the mandate into effect. The officer receiving the copy shall report his action both to the governor and to the circuit court. If from any cause the execution does not take place on the day appointed in the mandate, the governor may from time to time appoint another day for execution until the sentence is carried into effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 45; 1974, ch. 315, § 86; 1976, ch. 62, § 126; 1980, ch. 114, § 105, effective July 15, 1980.

431.220.
Execution of death sentence.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, every death sentence shall be executed by continuous intravenous injection of a substance or combination of substances sufficient to cause death. The lethal injection shall continue until the prisoner is dead.

Prisoners who receive a death sentence prior to March 31, 1998, shall choose the method of execution described in paragraph (a) of this subsection or the method of execution known as electrocution, which shall consist of passing through the prisoner’s body a current of electricity of sufficient intensity to cause death as quickly as possible. The application of the current shall continue until the prisoner is dead. If the prisoner refuses to make a choice at least twenty (20) days before the scheduled execution, the method shall be by lethal injection.

All executions of the death penalty by electrocution or lethal injection shall take place within the confines of the state penal institution designated by the Department of Corrections, and in an enclosure that will exclude public view thereof.

No physician shall be involved in the conduct of an execution except to certify cause of death provided that the condemned is declared dead by another person.

History.

1137-1: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 2; 1986, ch. 331, § 51, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 84, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 220, § 1, effective March 31, 1998.

431.223.
Method of execution in event of unconstitutionality of KRS 431.220.

If a court holds KRS

431.220

unconstitutional, the prisoner shall be executed in the manner provided by KRS

431.220

as that statute read before March 31, 1998.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 220, § 4, effective March 31, 1998.

431.224.
Retroactive applicability.

KRS

431.220

,

431.223

,

431.240

, and

431.250

shall apply retroactively to all prisoners sentenced to death before March 31, 1998.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 220, § 5, effective March 31, 1998.

431.230.
Conveyance of condemned to penitentiary — Duties of sheriff and superintendent. [Reenacted as KRS 431.215.]

431.240.
Time of execution — Governor to fix time in case of insanity, pregnancy, or escape — Administrative hearings — Transfer to forensic psychiatric facility in case of insanity.

Unless the execution is stayed for any cause, the warden of the institution or his deputy shall proceed, on the day named in the judgment of conviction, a governor’s warrant, or an order of the court, to cause the condemned person to be executed. The execution shall take place at a time designated by the warden of the institution where the execution is to take place on the day designated in the judgment of conviction, the governor’s warrant, or an order of the court.

If the condemned person is insane, as defined in KRS

431.213

or pregnant with child on the day designated for the execution, the execution shall be suspended until the condemned is restored to sanity or is delivered of child. The execution shall then take place under the warrant of the Governor and at the time designated by him, unless stayed by due process of law. If execution is suspended on the ground of insanity, the commissioner of the Department of Corrections shall transfer the condemned person to the Kentucky Correctional Psychiatric Center until the time he is restored to sanity. Any administrative hearings authorized under authority of this section shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

If the condemned person escapes from custody and is recaptured after the expiration of the date fixed for the execution, the Governor, upon receiving written notice of the recapture from the warden of the institution, shall send his warrant of execution to the warden by special messenger and shall name therein the day of execution. The warden shall then proceed to the execution thereof according to the provisions of KRS

431.215

to

431.270

.

When a judgment of death has not been executed on the day appointed therefor by the court, from any cause, the Governor, by a warrant under his hand and the seal of the Commonwealth, shall fix the day of the execution, which warrant shall be obeyed by the warden of the institution.

History.

1137-3, 1137-7, 1137-8: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 145, § 1; 1962, ch. 234, § 46; 1976, ch. 332, § 30; 1980, ch. 295, § 91, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 331, § 52, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 85, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 356, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 220, § 2, effective March 31, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 157, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 220 and 606 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

431.250.
Persons who may attend executions.

The following persons, and no others, may attend an execution: The executioner and the warden of the institution and his deputy or deputies and guards; the sheriff of the county in which the condemned was convicted; the commissioner of the Department of Corrections and representatives of the Department of Corrections designated by him; the physician and chaplain of the institution; a clergyman and three (3) other persons selected by the condemned; three (3) members of the victim’s family designated by the commissioner from among the victim’s spouse, adult children, parents, siblings, and grandparents; and nine (9) representatives of the news media as follows: one (1) representative from the daily newspaper with the largest circulation in the county where the execution will be conducted, one (1) representative from Associated Press Wire Service, one (1) representative from Kentucky Network, Inc., three (3) representatives for radio and television media within the state, and three (3) representatives for newspapers within the state. Use of audiovisual equipment by the representatives is prohibited during the execution. The Department of Corrections shall issue administrative regulations which govern media representation during the execution.

History.

1137-4: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 2; 1986, ch. 156, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 86, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 220, § 3, effective March 31, 1998.

431.260.
Warden’s return on judgment.

The warden of the penitentiary shall make due return, on the copy of the judgment of the court pronouncing the death sentence, of the manner, time and place of its execution by him. The return shall be filed by the clerk of the court in the papers of the case in his office.

History.

1137-5.